Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 28 O.S. 2021, Section 121, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 121. A. In all cases where publication of legal
notices is required or allowed by law, the person or official
desiring publication shall be required to pay:
1. For all matters other than tabular matter, fourteen cents
($0.14) per word for first insertion, and thirteen cents ($0.13) per
word for each subsequent insertion, with each separate group of
numerals included in the matter to be counted as one word,
regardless of the number of digits involved;
2. Effective November 1, 2005, for all matters other than
tabular matter, fifteen cents ($0.15) twenty-two cents ($0.22) per
word for first insertion, and fourteen cents ($0.14) twenty cents
($0.20) per word for each subsequent insertion, with each separate

group of letters or numerals included in the matter to be counted as
one word, regardless of the number of digits involved. Elimination
of space between words or numeric descriptions or the use of
hyphenation to combine words or numeric descriptions is prohibited;
and
3. 2. For all tabular matter, in not to exceed eight-point
type, including, but not limited to, graphics, maps, seals,
signature blocks, forms, spreadsheets, lists of persons, firms, and
corporations whose personal property taxes are delinquent and lists
of lands and town lots upon which taxes are delinquent, seventy
cents ($0.70) One Dollar and ten cents ($1.10) per line per
newspaper column in width, for first insertion, and sixty-five cents
($0.65) One Dollar ($1.00) per line per newspaper column in width,
for each subsequent insertion. A standard tabular line shall be a
minimum of one and one-half (1 1/2) inches in width.
B. A newspaper qualified to publish notices under the laws of
this state has the authority to publish all notices in a format
readable to a reasonable person. Type size used for notices shall
be no less than eight-point noncondensed type, with a maximum of
ten-point noncondensed type, unless a larger type size is requested
in writing by the person desiring the notice. Any notice submitted
to a newspaper which is unreadable or intended to be unreadable may
be rejected or typeset by the newspaper in a readable format.
C. Newspapers providing affidavits or proof of publication are
permitted to charge and collect a fee for a notarial act as defined
in Section 5 of Title 49 of the Oklahoma Statutes or Section 209 of
Title 49 of the Oklahoma Statutes as applicable.
D. For any notice placed in a newspaper, there shall be a
minimum charge of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for such notice if
the total calculated cost of words and lines described in paragraphs
1 and 2 of this subsection is less than Twenty-five Dollars
($25.00).
E. When notice by publication in a newspaper is required by
law, order of court, or other means, the newspaper publishing the
notice shall, at no additional cost to the person or official
desiring the notice, cause the notice to be placed on the newspaper
website if the newspaper operates a website, in front of any paywall
or paid access to the website. Additionally, the newspaper shall
upload notices to a statewide website established and maintained as
a joint venture of a majority of Oklahoma newspapers qualified to
ENR. H. B. NO. 2167 Page 2

publish notices by the laws of this state. Posting of notices on
the newspaper website and statewide website shall be performed in a
timely manner but shall not invalidate the publication of a notice
otherwise valid when published in the newspaper. Temporary outages
or service interruptions prohibiting the posting or display of such
notice shall be considered harmless error and the proper legal
notice requirements shall be considered met if the notice published
in the newspaper otherwise complies with the requirements for
publication. Access to the statewide website shall be free to the
public.
F. Any person or official required to publish a notice shall
submit the notice in writing or by electronic means by the deadline
established by the newspaper for such notices. No deadline shall be
set by the newspaper that is more than five (5) business days prior
to the date of publication, excluding the date of publication,
Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays in the State of Oklahoma.
Upon request, the newspaper shall confirm receipt of the notice and
notify the person or official in writing or by electronic means of
the dates of the issue or issues in which the notice shall appear.
If the newspaper fails to publish the notice in the issue
specified in the confirmation, the newspaper shall publish the
notice in a future issue specified by the person or official
desiring the notice at no charge. If the notice has multiple
insertions, only the first notice omitted by the newspaper shall be
required to run at no charge.
B. G. The county treasurer shall collect the cost of
publication of lists of lands and town lots sold for delinquent
taxes at original sale or resale from the individuals purchasing the
lands and town lots at the sale or resale involved, and shall
deposit all monies collected to the credit of the fund of the county
which paid the cost of publication. The publisher of the notice
shall be paid for the publication of the notice from the general
fund of the county or, if monies are not available in the general
fund of the county at the time of publication, from the "Resale-
Property Fund" of the county.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2167 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2167 Page 4